Washington statutes.
RCW 42.36.080

Disqualification based on doctrine—Time limitation for raising challenge.

Anyone seeking to rely on the appearance of fairness doctrine to disqualify a member of a decision-making body from participating in a decision must raise the challenge as soon as the basis for disqualification is made known to the individual. Where the basis is known or should reasonably have been known prior to the issuance of a decision and is not raised, it may not be relied on to invalidate the decision.

[ 1982 c 229 s 8.]